Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.395

Affordable housing occupants and tenants.

Information obtained by the department of commerce under chapter 43.185A RCW during monitoring activities or contract administration that reveals the name or other personal information of occupants or prospective tenants of affordable housing, or the street address of the residential real property occupied or applied for by tenants or prospective tenants of affordable housing, is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 275 s 11.]